apertium-zul.zul.twol
Alphabet

 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z 

 i:e u:o u:w m:0

 %{u%}:0 %{a%}:a %{n%}:n 
 %{u%}:u
 %{u%}:a
 %{w%}:0
 %{w%}:w
 %{y%}:0
 %{y%}:y
 %{k%}:k
 %{k%}:0
 %>:0 ; 

Sets 

Vow = a e i o u ; 

Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t u v w x y z ;

CoalVow = a i o u ;

Loc = e i o u ;

Rules 
"Glide insertion before subject concord"
%{w%}:w <=> :a %>: _ %>: ;

"Y insertion before subject concord"
%{y%}:y <=> :a %>: _ %>: ;

"Class 1 and 1a change to ka in negative"
%{k%}:k <=> :a %>: _ %>: ;

"u changes to a after k"
%{u%}:a <=> %{k%}:k _ %>: ;

!"M turns into n before a nasal glide cluster"
!m%{u%}:0 <=> _ %> :n :y ;"

"U turns into w before the vowel a"
%{u%}:0 <=> %{w%}:w _ %>: :a ;

!"two consecutive n characters condense into one"
!nn:n <=> : ;

!"umu- replaces um- before monosyllabic stems"
!%{u%}:u <=> _ %>:  Cons+: Vow: # ; 

!"ab- replaces aba- before stems with a vowel"
!%{a%}:0 <=> _ %>: :Vow ; 

!"delete n before m"
!%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: :m ; 

!"assimilation"
!%{n%}:m <=> _ %>: :p ; 

!"Coalescence 1 the a is deleted from the prefixing morpheme when before a vowel"
!a:0 <=> _ %>: CoalVow: ;

!"Coalescence 2 the remaining i or u vowel raises or lowers after a is deleted"
!vx:vy <=> a:0 %>: _ ;
!	where vx in ( i u )
!	      vy in ( e o )
!        matched 
!;

!"the vowel following an e is deleted"
!Vx:0 <=>  e: %>: _ ;
!	where Vx in ( i o u ) ;
